test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv24_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    kúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: kúgv
    kúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: kúgv
    kúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: kúgv
    kúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: kúgvar
    kúgv+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: kýr
    kúgv+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: kúm
    kúgv+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: kúgva
    kúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: kúgvin
    kúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: kúnna
    kúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: kúnni
    kúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: kúgvarinnar
    kúgv+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: kýrnar
    kúgv+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: [kúnum, kýrnum]
    kúgv+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: kúgvanna
